Maryland, session 2026, HB0271.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 11–101(h) through (aa) of Article – State Finance and Procurement of the
Annotated Code of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 11–101(i) through (bb),
respectively.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
11–101.
(a) In this Division II the following words have the meanings indicated unless:
(1) the context clearly requires a different meaning; or
(2) a different definition is provided for a particular title or provision.
(H) “CONTRACT MODIFICATION” MEANS A WRITTEN ALTERATION THAT
AFFECTS SPECIFICATIONS, DELIVERY POINT, DATE OF DELIVERY, PERIOD OF
PERFORMANCE, PRICE, QUANTITY, OR OTHER PROVISIONS OF A PROCUREMENT
CONTRACT AND IS ACCOMPLISHED:
(1) IN ACCORDANCE WITH A CONTRACT PROVISION; OR
(2) BY MUTUAL ACTION OF THE PARTIES TO AN EXISTING
PROCUREMENT CONTRACT.
13–201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Change order” means a written order that:
(1) is signed by the procurement officer; and
(2) directs the contractor to make changes that the procurement contract
authorizes the procurement officer to order without the consent of the contractor.
(c) “Contract modification” [means a written alteration that:

HOUSE BILL 271 3
(1) affects specifications, delivery point, date of delivery, period of
performance, price, quantity, or other provisions of a procurement contract; and
(2) is accomplished by mutual action of the parties to the procurement
contract] HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 11–101 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(d) “Cost–reimbursement contract” means a procurement contract under which
the State reimburses a contractor for fees and other costs that are:
(1) recognized as allowable and allocable under the regulations of the
Board on price and cost principles; and
(2) within a stated ceiling.
15–112.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “CONTRACT MODIFICATION” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 11–101 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO ALL STATE PROCUREMENT CONTRACTS.
(C) A PROCUREMENT OFFICER MAY APPROVE A CONTRACT MODIFICATION
IF:
(1) THE CONTRACT MODIFICATION DOES NOT MATERIALLY CHANGE
THE SCOPE OF WORK; AND
(2) THE CONTRACT MODIFICATION DOES NOT INCREASE THE VALUE
OF THE CONTRACT BY AN AMOUNT THAT EXCEEDS THE SMALL PROCUREMENT
AMOUNTS SPECIFIED IN § 13–109 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(D) THE HEAD OF A PRIMARY PROCUREMENT UNIT, THE CHIEF
PROCUREMENT OFFICER, OR THE HEAD OF A PRIMARY PROCUREMENT UNIT’S
DESIGNEE OR THE CHIEF PROCUREMENT OFFICER’S DESIGNEE MAY APPROVE A
CONTRACT MODIFICATION IF:
(1) THE CONTRACT MODIFICATION DOES NOT MATERIALLY CHANGE
THE SCOPE OF WORK; AND
(2) THE CONTRACT MODIFICATION DOES NOT INCREASE THE TOTAL
VALUE OF THE CONTRACT BY MORE THAN FIVE TIMES THE SMALL PROCUREMENT
AMOUNTS SPECIFIED IN § 13–109 OF THIS ARTICLE.

HOUSE BILL 271
(E) A PROCUREMENT OFFICER SHALL DOCUMENT ANY CONTRACT
MODIFICATION IN THE PROCUREMENT FILE.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.